Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-3,110
Anonymity; court orders authorized.

In every civil
or criminal proceeding or action brought under the Pain-Capable Unborn Child
Protection Act, the court shall rule whether the anonymity of any woman upon
whom an abortion has been performed or attempted shall be preserved from public
disclosure if she does not give her consent to such disclosure. The court,
upon motion or sua sponte, shall make such a ruling and, upon determining
that her anonymity should be preserved, shall issue orders to the parties,
witnesses, and counsel and shall direct the sealing of the record and exclusion
of individuals from courtrooms or hearing rooms to the extent necessary to
safeguard her identity from public disclosure. Each such order shall be accompanied
by specific written findings explaining why the anonymity of the woman should
be preserved from public disclosure, why the order is essential to that end,
how the order is narrowly tailored to serve that interest, and why no reasonable
less restrictive alternative exists. In the absence of written consent of
the woman upon whom an abortion has been performed or attempted, anyone, other
than a public official, who brings an action under section 28-3,109 shall
do so under a pseudonym. This section shall not be construed to conceal the
identity of the plaintiff or of witnesses from the defendant or from attorneys
for the defendant.

Laws 2010, LB1103, § 9.